California, session 20252026, AB2038.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Wildfires continue to cause widespread destruction of homes across California, displacing families and destabilizing insurance markets in affected communities.(b) Senate Bill 824 (Chapter 616 of the Statutes of 2018) established a mandatory one-year moratorium on residential insurance cancellations and nonrenewals following a wildfire-related state of emergency.(c) In practice, recovery and rebuilding following a catastrophic wildfire routinely takes multiple years, particularly for homeowners who suffer a total loss of their residence.(d) Extending and tailoring the nonrenewal moratorium based on the severity of loss is necessary to ensure housing stability, prevent displacement, and allow homeowners a meaningful opportunity to rebuild and mitigate risk.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to strengthen consumer protections by expanding the Insurance Commissioner’s authority to prohibit residential insurance nonrenewals following wildfires while maintaining a narrowly tailored, loss-based framework.SEC. 2. Section 675.1 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:675.1. (a) In the case of a total loss to the primary insured structure under a policy of residential property insurance subject to Section 675, the following provisions apply:(1) If reconstruction of the primary insured structure has not been completed by the time of policy renewal, the insurer, prior to or at the time of renewal, and after consultation by the insurer or its representative with the insured as to what limits and coverages might or might not be needed, shall adjust the limits and coverages, write an additional policy, or attach an endorsement to the policy that reflects the change, if any, in the insured’s exposure to loss. The insurer shall adjust the premium charged to reflect any change in coverage.(2) The insurer shall not cancel coverage while the primary insured structure is being rebuilt, except for the reasons specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 676. The insurer shall not use the fact that the primary insured structure is in damaged condition as a result of the total loss as the sole basis for a decision to cancel the policy pursuant to subdivision (e) of that section.(3) Except for the reasons specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 676, the insurer shall offer, for at least the next two three annual renewal periods, but no less than 24 36 months of coverage from the date of the loss, to renew the policy in accordance with paragraph (1) if the total loss to the primary insured structure was caused by a disaster, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1689.14 of the Civil Code, the loss was not also due to the negligence of the insured, and losses have not occurred subsequent to the disaster-related total loss that relate to physical or risk changes to the insured property that result in the property becoming uninsurable.(4) With respect to policies of residential earthquake insurance, the California Earthquake Authority, or any insurer, including a participating insurer, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 10089.5, may defer its initial implementation of this section until no later than October 1, 2005.(5) With respect to a residential earthquake insurance policy issued by the California Earthquake Authority, the following provisions apply:(A) The participating insurer that issued the underlying policy of residential property insurance on the primary insured structure shall consult with the insured as to what limits and coverages might or might not be needed as required by paragraph (1).(B) The California Earthquake Authority, in lieu of meeting the requirements of paragraph (1), shall establish procedures and practices that allow it to reasonably accommodate the needs and interests of consumers in maintaining appropriate earthquake insurance coverage, within the statutory and regulatory limitations on the types of insurance coverages and the coverage limits of the policies that the authority may issue.(b) (1) An insurer shall not cancel or refuse to renew a policy of residential property insurance for a property located in any ZIP Code within or adjacent to the fire perimeter, for one year two years after the declaration of a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, based solely on the fact that the insured structure is located in an area in which a wildfire has occurred. This prohibition applies to all policies of residential property insurance in effect at the time of the declared emergency.(2) For the purposes of this section, the fire perimeter shall be determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection in consultation with the Office of Emergency Services. The department shall provide the commissioner with data describing the fire perimeter sufficient for the commissioner to determine which ZIP Codes are within or adjacent to the fire perimeter. The commissioner shall then issue a bulletin to inform insurers which ZIP Codes are subject to this subdivision.(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply in any of the following circumstances:(1) If willful or grossly negligent acts or omissions by the named insured, or his or her representatives, are discovered that materially increase any of the risks insured against.(2) If losses unrelated to the postdisaster loss condition of the property have occurred that would collectively render the risk ineligible for renewal.(3) If there are physical or risk changes to the insured property beyond the catastrophe-damaged condition of the structures and surface landscape that result in the property becoming uninsurable.(d) For the purposes of this section, “policy of residential property insurance” has the meaning described in subdivision (a) of Section 10087.SECTION 1.Section 14085 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:14085.(a)Upon application, the commissioner shall issue a crop insurance adjuster license to a person who meets both of the following requirements:(1)Obtains an insurance adjuster license, with the exception of the examination requirement of Section 14026.(2)Provides evidence that they have satisfactorily completed the loss adjustment training curriculum and competency testing required by the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation Standard Reinsurance Agreement.(b)For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(1)“Crop insurance” means insurance provided by the private insurance market that indemnifies for damage to crops from unfavorable weather conditions, fire, lightning, flood, hail, insect infestation, disease, or other yield-reducing conditions or perils, and multiple peril crop insurance reinsured by the federal crop insurance corporation.(2)“Crop insurance adjuster” means a person who investigates, negotiates, or settles crop insurance claims.(c)A person shall not act as or purport to be a crop insurance adjuster unless licensed as a crop insurance adjuster.(d)A person shall not contract, employ, or use any other person to adjust claims made under a crop insurance policy unless the other person is licensed as a crop insurance adjuster.(e)All provisions of this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall apply to crop insurance adjusters, unless exempted by, or in conflict with, this article or the regulations adopted pursuant to this article.(f)The commissioner may adopt regulations to implement this article, including, but not limited to, regulations that require applicants to satisfy other competency requirements in addition to or instead of those referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), and regulations that establish standards of practice for crop insurance adjusters.